Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 390.15, is amended to read: 390.15 FEES. new text begin (a) new text end The coroner or medical examiner may charge a fee for cremation approval, duplication of reports, and other administrative functions to recover reasonable expenses, subject to county board approval. new text begin (b) A coroner or medical examiner may charge a fee to cover reasonable expenses for conducting a medical record review when an individual, facility, or organization refuses to act as the medical certifier and complete a death record as required under Minnesota Rules, part 4601.1800. The fee may include administrative expenses associated with the medical record review and completion of a death record. new text end